Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202647-1113
Access to records, documents, and reports.

The department may allow a community work release and reentry center to have access to all of the records, documents, and reports in the custody of the department, other than presentence investigation reports, that relate to any committed offender who is assigned to the center.

Laws 2024, LB631, § 13;

Laws 2025, LB150, § 69.